Utah statutes.
67-19-12.5.   Creation of Flexible Benefit Program -- Rulemaking power
granted to establish program.
(1)  The department shall establish for calendar year 1990 and thereafter a
Flexible Benefit Program under Section 125 of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986.
(2)  The department shall establish accounts for all employees eligible for
benefits which meet the nondiscrimination requirements of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986.
(3) (a)  Each account established under this section shall include employee
paid premiums for health and dental services.
(b)  The account may also include, at the option of the employee, out-of-
pocket employee medical and dependent care expenses.
(c)  Accounts may also include other expenses allowed under the Internal
Revenue Code of 1986.
(4)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the department may make rules to implement the program established under
this section.
